Missouri, session 2026, HCR46.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
WHEREAS, Charlie Kirk, born on October 14, 1993, and tragically martyred by
assassination on September 10, 2025, was the preeminent voice of a generation, inspiring
millions of young Americans to engage in civic discourse, champion conservative principles,
and reclaim the foundational values of liberty, limited government, and individual
responsibility; and

WHEREAS, the founder and CEO of Turning Point USA, Kirk led a transformative
movement across college campuses and beyond, empowering students to defend free markets,
secure borders, Christian values, and traditional family structures against ideological
overreach; and

WHEREAS, Kirk stood as a modern civil rights champion, fearlessly advocating for
equal opportunity under the law, colorblind meritocracy, and the protection of constitutional
rights for all citizens, regardless of race, creed, or background, in an era of divisive identity
politics; and

WHEREAS, a vocal and unapologetic Christian, Kirk embodied the Christian
heritage that undergirds American exceptionalism, publicly proclaiming his faith as a guiding
force in the pursuit of justice, moral clarity, and the defense of the unborn; and

WHEREAS, through relentless persecution, cancellation attempts, smears, and
ultimately his assassination, Kirk became a martyr for truth and faith, enduring personal and

HCR 46 2
professional attacks with unwavering resolve to expose corruption, challenge elite narratives,
and uphold objective reality in the face of censorship and cultural decay; and

WHEREAS, as a tireless free speech advocate, Kirk fought against Big Tech
suppression, university indoctrination, and government overreach, ensuring that dissenting
voices, especially those of the next generation, could flourish in the public square, thereby
preserving the First Amendment as the bedrock of a free society:

NOW THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED that the members of the House of
Representatives of the One Hundred Third General Assembly, Second Regular Session, the
Senate concurring therein, hereby designate October 14th of each year as "Charlie Kirk Day"
in Missouri to honor his extraordinary contributions to American discourse, faith, and
freedom, and to commemorate his ultimate sacrifice for these principles; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that the General Assembly encourages Missourians
to reflect on the principles Kirk championed, participate in educational events promoting
civic engagement, and honor his legacy as a martyr for truth and liberty and to observe
Charlie Kirk Day with appropriate ceremonies, programs, and activities that recognize his
role as a beacon of hope and heroism for future generations; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that this resolution be sent to the Governor for his
approval or rejection pursuant to the Missouri Constitution.
✔